Illinois, session 104th, HB4663.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Autonomous Vehicle Pilot Project Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software 8that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic 9driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether it is 10limited to a specific operational design domain.11    "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped with 12an automated driving system designed to function as a level 4 13or 5 system under SAE J3016B.14    "Autonomous vehicle manufacturer" means a person who 15manufactures the autonomous vehicle or automated driving 16system for use on public roads and highways.17    "Autonomous vehicle pilot project" means an authorized 18pilot project, testing, or demonstration of autonomous 19vehicles available on the public roads and highways of this 20State performed under this Act.21    "Department" means the Department of Transportation.22    "Dynamic driving task" means all of the real-time 23operational and tactical functions required to operate a   HB4663- 2 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1vehicle in on-road traffic, excluding the strategic functions, 2such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and 3waypoints, and including, but not limited to:4        (1) lateral vehicle motion control via steering;5        (2) longitudinal motion control via acceleration and 6    deceleration;7        (3) monitoring the driving environment via object and 8    event detection, recognition, classification, and response 9    preparation;10        (4) object and event response execution;11        (5) maneuver planning; and12        (6) enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and 13    gesturing.14    "Dynamic driving task fallback" means the response by a 15person or human driver to either perform the dynamic driving 16task or achieve a minimal risk condition after occurrence of a 17dynamic driving task performance-relevant system failure or 18upon operational design domain exit, or the response by an 19automated driving system to achieve minimal risk condition, 20given the same circumstances.21    "Evaluation data" means any data processed to support the 22testing, development, legal and regulatory compliance, 23operation, safety and improvement of automated driving systems 24or autonomous vehicles, including, but not limited to, 25real-time perception, collision avoidance, sensors, LiDAR, 26radar and other sensor data, environmental, traffic,   HB4663- 3 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1communication, network, camera, incident data, point cloud 2data, images, videos, and audio recordings (including, but not 3limited to, images, videos, and audio recordings of physical 4surroundings, objects, and people), and information derived 5therefrom.6    "Human driver" means a natural person in the vehicle with 7a valid license to operate a motor vehicle who controls all or 8part of the dynamic driving task.9    "First responder interaction plan" means a document of 10procedures specifying how first responders should interact 11with an autonomous vehicle that, at minimum, describes:12        (1) how to communicate with a fleet support specialist 13    who is available during the times the autonomous vehicle 14    is in operation;15        (2) how to safely remove the autonomous vehicle from 16    the roadway and steps to safely tow the vehicle;17        (3) how to recognize whether the autonomous vehicle is 18    in autonomous mode; and19        (4) any additional information the person or the 20    manufacturer of the autonomous vehicle or the manufacturer 21    of the automated driving system deems necessary regarding 22    hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated 23    with the operation of the autonomous vehicle.24    "Minimal risk condition" means a condition to which a 25person, human driver, or automated driving system may bring a 26vehicle after performing the dynamic driving task fallback in   HB4663- 4 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or 2should not be completed.3    "Operational design domain" means the operating conditions 4under which a given automated driving system is specifically 5designed to function, including, but not limited to, 6environmental, geographic, and time-of-day restrictions, or 7the requisite presence or absence of certain traffic or 8roadway characteristics.9    "Processing" or "process" means any operation or set of 10operations which is performed on data or on sets of data, 11whether by automated means, including, but not limited to, 12collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, 13adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, 14disclosure by transmission or dissemination or otherwise 15making available, alignment or combination, restriction, 16erasure, or destruction.17    "Request to intervene" means a notification by an 18automated driving system to a human driver that the human 19driver should promptly begin or resume performance of part or 20all of the dynamic driving task.21    "SAE J3016B" means the Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms 22Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor 23Vehicles published by SAE International in June 2018. 24    Section 10. Autonomous vehicle pilot project.25    (a) In order to commence an autonomous vehicle pilot   HB4663- 5 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1project, a person must provide to the Department a statement 2that sets forth the operational design domain for an 3autonomous vehicle pilot project as described in subsection 4(b).5    (b) The operational design domain for an autonomous 6vehicle pilot project must be confined to counties having or 7exceeding a population of 1,000,000 individuals, as determined 8by the most recent federal decennial census, Sangamon County, 9or the counties of Madison, St. Clair, and Monroe, 10collectively referred to as the Metro East region.11    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), the Department may, by 12administrative rule, authorize the statewide deployment of 13autonomous vehicles beyond the operational design domain 14described in this Section after a period of 3 years following 15the effective date of this Act, as long as the Department 16determines the pilot projects conducted under this Act have 17demonstrated safety and operational readiness. 18    Section 15. Operation of autonomous vehicles.19    (a) A person may operate an autonomous vehicle on the 20public roads of this State with the automated driving system 21engaged only if the vehicle meets the following conditions:22        (1) if a failure of the automated driving system 23    occurs that renders that system unable to perform the 24    entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended 25    operational design domain, the autonomous vehicle with   HB4663- 6 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1    either achieve a minimal risk condition or, when being 2    operated by a human driver, issue a request to intervene;3        (2) the autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in 4    compliance with the applicable traffic and motor vehicle 5    safety laws, rules, and regulations of this State when 6    reasonable to do so, unless an exemption has been granted 7    by the Department;8        (3) if required by federal law, the vehicle bears the 9    required manufacturer's certification label indicating 10    that at the time of ins manufacture it has been certified 11    to be in compliance with all applicable Federal Motor 12    Vehicle Safety Standards, including reference to any 13    exemption granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety 14    Administration; and15        (4) the autonomous vehicle is covered by motor vehicle 16    liability coverage or self-insurance in an amount equal to 17    or greater than the amount of coverage required under the 18    laws of this State.19    (b) In addition to satisfying the requirements of 20subsection (a), a person may operate an autonomous vehicle on 21the public roads of this State only if the person receives and 22maintains authorization to operate autonomous vehicles from 23the Department. To receive such authorization, a person must 24provide the following to the Department:25        (1) the name, address, and principal point of contact 26    for the person applying for authorization;  HB4663- 7 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1        (2) an applicable written autonomous vehicle pilot 2    project statement as required under subsection (a) of 3    Section 10;4        (3) a written statement by the person or the 5    manufacturer of the vehicle or the automated driving 6    system certifying that each autonomous vehicle complies 7    with subsection (a);8        (4) a first responder interaction plan; and9        (5) evidence of financial responsibility, including an 10    instrument of insurance, surety bond, or proof of 11    self-insurance in the amount of $1,000,000 per incident in 12    a form and manner required by the Department.13    (c) On receipt of the documents required under subsection 14(b) and verifying that the application is complete and 15accurate, the Department shall approve the application within 1610 days.17    (d) An authorization issued by the Department under this 18Section does not expire and remains active unless suspended, 19revoked, or canceled by the Department.20    (e) The authorization holder shall provide to the 21Department an update to the information described in 22subsection (b) no later than 30 days after the information 23materially changes.24    (f) The Department may immediately suspend, revoke, or 25cancel the authorization issued under subsection (c) if the 26authorization fails to comply with subsection (e).  HB4663- 8 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1    (g) The Department shall rescind the suspension, 2revocation, or cancellation within 10 business days of 3receiving the updated documentation. 4    Section 20. Licensing. When an automated driving system 5installed on a motor vehicle is engaged:6        (1) the automated driving system is considered the 7    driver or operator, for the purpose of assessing 8    compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws 9    and shall be deemed to satisfy electronically all physical 10    acts required by a driver or operator of the vehicle; and11        (2) the automated driving system is considered to be 12    licensed to operate the vehicle. 13    Section 25. Duties following crashes involving autonomous 14vehicles. In the event of a crash:15        (1) The autonomous vehicle shall remain on the scene 16    of the crash if required by Article IV of Chapter 11 of the 17    Illinois Vehicle Code consistent with its capability under 18    Section 15.19        (2) The owner of the autonomous vehicle, the 20    authorization holder, or a person on behalf of the vehicle 21    owner shall report any crashes or collisions consistent 22    with Article IV of Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle 23    Code.   HB4663- 9 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1    Section 30. Registration and title.2    (a) An autonomous vehicle shall be properly registered in 3accordance with Article IV of Chapter 3 of the Illinois 4Vehicle Code. If an autonomous vehicle is registered in this 5State, the vehicle shall be identified on the registration as 6an autonomous vehicle.7    (b) An autonomous vehicle shall be properly titled in 8accordance with Article I of Chapter 3 of the Illinois Vehicle 9Code. If an autonomous vehicle is titled in this State, the 10vehicle shall be identified on the title as an autonomous 11vehicle. 12    Section 35. Operation of a motor vehicle with an automated 13driving system by a human driver.14    (a) A person may operate an autonomous vehicle if:15        (1) the automated driving system of such autonomous 16    vehicle will issue a request to intervene if the automated 17    driving system is not capable of performing the entire 18    dynamic driving task with the expectation that the person 19    will respond appropriately to such a request; and20        (2) the autonomous vehicle is capable of being 21    operated in compliance with Chapter 11 of the Illinois 22    Vehicle Code when reasonable to do so unless an exemption 23    has been granted by the Department.24    (b) Nothing in this Act prohibits or restricts a human 25driver from operating an autonomous vehicle equipped with   HB4663- 10 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1controls that allow for the human driver to control all or part 2of the dynamic driving task. 3    Section 40. Vehicle equipment standards. An autonomous 4vehicle that is designed to be operated exclusively by the 5automated driving system for all trips is not subject to motor 6vehicle equipment laws, rules, or regulations of this State 7that:8        (1) relate to or support motor vehicle operation by a 9    human driver seated in the vehicle; and10        (2) are not relevant for an automated driving system. 11    Section 45. Evaluation data.12    (a) As long as evaluation data is processed in compliance 13with subsections (b) and (c) and for the purpose of developing 14automated driving systems and autonomous vehicles, autonomous 15vehicle manufacturers are explicitly authorized to process 16evaluation data and shall not be subject to civil lawsuits or 17liable for actual, statutory, consequential, punitive, or 18other damages based on their processing of evaluation data, 19including, but not limited to, lawsuits or liability based on 20the alleged violation of State laws requiring individual 21consent or authorization to the collection of evaluation data.22    (b) Autonomous vehicle manufacturers shall not use 23evaluation data for the purpose of identifying a specific 24individual.  HB4663- 11 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1    (c) Autonomous vehicle manufacturers must implement, 2maintain, and enforce, for as long as autonomous vehicle 3operators process evaluation data, appropriate technical and 4organizational measures to ensure a level of security 5appropriate to the risks presented by the processing of the 6evaluation data.7    (d) The Attorney General shall have sole enforcement of 8the obligations in subsections (b) and (c) and may enforce 9violations of subsections (b) and (c) as it would enforce 10unlawful practices under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 11Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority 12granted to the Attorney General by the Consumer Fraud and 13Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be available to the 14Attorney General for enforcement of subsections (b) and (c). 15    Section 50. Controlling authority; home rule.16    (a) Unless otherwise provided by this Act and 17notwithstanding any other provision of law, autonomous 18vehicles and automated driving systems are governed 19exclusively by this Act. The Department is the sole and 20exclusive State agency that may implement the provisions of 21this Act.22    (b) The regulation of autonomous vehicles is an exclusive 23power and function of the State. A home rule unit may not 24regulate autonomous vehicles. This Section is a denial and 25limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection   HB4663- 12 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 2    Section 55. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 32029. 4    Section 60. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-101 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-101)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-101)7    Sec. 6-101. Drivers must have licenses or permits. 8    (a) No person, except those expressly exempted by Section 96-102, shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this 10State unless such person has a valid license or permit, an 11Illinois mobile driver's license, or a restricted driving 12permit, issued under the provisions of this Act.13    (b) No person shall drive a motor vehicle unless the 14person holds a valid license or permit, an Illinois mobile 15driver's license, or a restricted driving permit issued under 16this Act. Any person to whom a license is issued under the 17provisions of this Act must surrender to the Secretary of 18State all valid licenses or permits, except that an applicant 19for a non-domiciled commercial learner's permit or commercial 20driver's license shall not be required to surrender a license 21or permit issued by the applicant's state or country of 22domicile. No driver's license or instruction permit shall be 23issued to any person who holds a valid Foreign State license,   HB4663- 13 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1identification card, or permit unless such person first 2surrenders to the Secretary of State any such valid Foreign 3State license, identification card, or permit.4    (b-5) Any person who commits a violation of subsection (a) 5or (b) of this Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, if 6at the time of the violation the person's driver's license or 7permit was cancelled under clause (a)9 of Section 6-201 of 8this Code. 9    (c) Any person licensed as a driver hereunder shall not be 10required by any city, village, incorporated town or other 11municipal corporation to obtain any other license to exercise 12the privilege thereby granted.13    (d) In addition to other penalties imposed under this 14Section, any person in violation of this Section who is also in 15violation of Section 7-601 of this Code relating to mandatory 16insurance requirements shall have his or her motor vehicle 17immediately impounded by the arresting law enforcement 18officer. The motor vehicle may be released to any licensed 19driver upon a showing of proof of insurance for the motor 20vehicle that was impounded and the notarized written consent 21for the release by the vehicle owner.22    (e) In addition to other penalties imposed under this 23Section, the vehicle of any person in violation of this 24Section who is also in violation of Section 7-601 of this Code 25relating to mandatory insurance requirements and who, in 26violating this Section, has caused death or personal injury to   HB4663- 14 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1another person is subject to forfeiture under Sections 36-1 2and 36-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012. For the purposes of this 3Section, a personal injury shall include any type A injury as 4indicated on the traffic crash report completed by a law 5enforcement officer that requires immediate professional 6attention in either a doctor's office or a medical facility. A 7type A injury shall include severely bleeding wounds, 8distorted extremities, and injuries that require the injured 9party to be carried from the scene.10    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile driver's 11license to an individual in addition to, and not instead of, a 12license or an identification card if the Secretary of State 13has issued a driver's license to the person.14    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements with an agency 15of the State, another state, or the United States to 16facilitate the issuance, use, and verification of a mobile 17driver's license issued by the Secretary or another state.18    (3) Any mobile driver's license issued by the Secretary 19shall be in accordance with American Association of Motor 20Vehicle Administrator's Mobile Driver's License (mDL) 21Implementation Guidelines, Version 1.1.22    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile driver's license 23in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 24physical possession of the device on which the electronic 25credential is accessed during verification.26    (g) As used in this Section:  HB4663- 15 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1    "Mobile driver's license" means an electronic extension of 2the Secretary of State issued physical driver's license that 3conveys identity and driving privilege information and is in 4compliance with the American Association of Motor Vehicle 5Administrator's Mobile Driver's License Implementation 6Guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard. "Mobile driver's 7license" does not include a digital copy, photograph, or image 8of a driver's license that is not downloaded through the 9Secretary of State's application on a mobile device.10    (h) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 11physical driver's license to a law enforcement officer, a 12representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 13a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 14consequences for failure to produce such a license.15    (i) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 16necessary to implement a mobile driver's license.17    (j) The display of a mobile driver's license shall not 18serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 19officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 20other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 21presents his or her mobile device to a law enforcement officer 22for purposes of displaying a mobile driver's license, the law 23enforcement officer shall promptly return the mobile device to 24the person once the officer has had an opportunity to verify 25the identity and license status of the person. Except for 26willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer,   HB4663- 16 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 2be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 3mobile device.4    (k) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 5driver's license as defined in this subsection shall not 6exceed $6. 7    (l) When an automated driving system installed on a motor 8vehicle is engaged:9        (1) the automated driving system is considered the 10    driver or operator, for the purpose of assessing 11    compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws 12    and shall be deemed to satisfy electronically all physical 13    acts required by a driver or operator of the vehicle; and14        (2) the automated driving system is considered to be 15    licensed to operate the vehicle. 16(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    Section 65. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 18Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 19    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)20    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who 21knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 22Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the 23Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 24Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union   HB4663- 17 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 2Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 3Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 4Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 5Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 6Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 7the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe 8and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 9Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 10the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 11Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 12Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 13Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 14Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section 156-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115, 1618d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 17Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real Property 18Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, the 19Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental Health 20Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection Act, or 21the Student Online Personal Protection Act, or subsection (b) 22or (c) of Section 45 the Autonomous Vehicle Pilot Project Act 23commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.24(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 25100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4663- 18 -LRB104 16033 LNS 29295 b1becoming law.